Maryland, session 2025, HB1220.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Business Regulation
5–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(EE) “TRANSPORTATION PROTECTION AGREEMENT” MEANS AN AGREEMENT
THAT PRIMARILY PROVIDES FOR THE COORDINATION AND ARRANGING OF ALL
PROFESSIONAL SERVICES RELATED TO THE PREPARATION AND TRANSPORTATION
OF HUMAN REMAINS, HYDROLYZED REMAINS, OR SOIL REMAINS.
5–701.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) (1) “Preneed burial contract” means a written instrument under which
preneed goods or preneed services are to be sold and delivered or performed.

HOUSE BILL 1220 3
(2) “PRENEED BURIAL CONTRACT” DOES NOT INCLUDE A
TRANSPORTATION PROTECTION AGREEMENT.
5–805.
A TRANSPORTATION PROTECTION AGREEMENT SOLD BY A PERSON
REGISTERED UNDER THIS TITLE IS NOT AN INSURANCE CONTRACT AND IS NOT
SUBJECT TO REGULATION UNDER THE INSURANCE ARTICLE.
Article – Health Occupations
7–101.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(v) (1) “Pre–need contract” means an agreement between a consumer and a
licensed funeral director, licensed mortician, or surviving spouse to provide any goods and
services purchased prior to the time of death. Goods and services shall include:
[(1)] (I) A service, including any form of preservation and disposition or
cremation, that a mortician normally provides in the ordinary course of business; or
[(2)] (II) Merchandise, including a casket, vault, or clothing, that a
mortician normally provides in the ordinary course of business.
(2) “PRE–NEED CONTRACT” DOES NOT INCLUDE A TRANSPORTATION
PROTECTION AGREEMENT.
(X) “TRANSPORTATION PROTECTION AGREEMENT” MEANS AN AGREEMENT
THAT PRIMARILY PROVIDES FOR THE COORDINATION AND ARRANGING OF ALL
PROFESSIONAL SERVICES RELATED TO THE PREPARATION AND TRANSPORTATION
OF HUMAN REMAINS, HYDROLYZED REMAINS, OR SOIL REMAINS.
7–412.
A TRANSPORTATION PROTECTION AGREEMENT SOLD BY A LICENSEE IS NOT
AN INSURANCE CONTRACT AND IS NOT SUBJECT TO REGULATION UNDER THE
INSURANCE ARTICLE.
Article – Insurance
1–202.
(a) This article does not apply to:

HOUSE BILL 1220
(4) a voluntary noncontractual religious publication arrangement that:
(xii) provides the following verbatim written disclaimer as a separate
cover sheet for any and all documents distributed by or on behalf of the exempt
arrangement, including applications, guidelines, promotional, or informational material
and all periodic publications:
“Notice
This publication is not issued by an insurance company nor is it offered through an
insurance company. It does not guarantee or promise that your medical bills will be
published or assigned to others for payment. No other subscriber will be compelled to
contribute toward the cost of your medical bills. Therefore, this publication should never be
considered a substitute for an insurance policy. This activity is not regulated by the State
Insurance Administration, and your liabilities are not covered by the Life and Health
Guaranty Fund. Whether or not you receive any payments for medical expenses and
whether or not this entity continues to operate, you are always liable for any unpaid bills.”;
[or]
(5) except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a self–funded
student health plan operated by an independent institution of higher education, as defined
in § 10–101 of the Education Article, that provides health care services to its students and
their dependents if the institution files on July 1 each year, for the student health plan that
will be offered to students for the upcoming school year, a report with the Commissioner
certifying under penalties of perjury that:
(v) the institution operates the student health plan in compliance
with Title 15, Subtitles 10A and 10D of this article; OR
(6) A TRANSPORTATION PROTECTION AGREEMENT, AS DEFINED IN §
5–101 OF THE BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE OR § 7–101 OF THE HEALTH
OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE, THAT IS SOLD BY A PERSON REGISTERED UNDER TITLE 5
OF THE BUSINESS REGULATION ARTICLE OR TITLE 7 OF THE HEALTH
OCCUPATIONS ARTICLE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.